District of Columbia statutes.
21-1106

Repealed

Warrant to take into custody; detention or temporary guardianship; place of detention

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 604a1, 25 DCR 5094
1981 Ed., §§ 21-1102 to 21-1108A.